Alaska statutes. Title 39. Public Officers and Employees.
Article 8. General Provisions.

Sec. 39.25.900.
Penalties.

A person who wilfully violates a provision of this chapter or of the personnel rules adopted under this chapter is guilty of a misdemeanor.

A state employee who is convicted of a misdemeanor under this chapter or the personnel rules adopted under this chapter immediately forfeits the employee’s office or position.

History.

(§ 20 ch 144 SLA 1960)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

39.25.210

. Renumbered in 1995.

Cross references. —

For provision that the crime defined in this section is a class A misdemeanor, see AS

11.81.250(c)

; for fines and sentences for class A misdemeanors, see AS

12.55.035

and

12.55.135

.

Sec. 39.25.910.
Conflict with federal requirements.

If any part of this chapter conflicts with federal requirements that are a condition precedent to the allocation of federal funds to the state, the conflicting part of this chapter is inoperative solely to the extent of the conflict and with respect to the agency directly affected, and does not affect the operation of the remainder of this chapter in its application.

History.

(§ 22 ch 144 SLA 1960)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

39.25.190

. Renumbered in 1995.

Sec. 39.25.990.
Definitions.

In this chapter,

“fraud” means for a person to knowingly

create or confirm another’s false impression which the person does not believe to be true, including false impressions as to law or value and false impressions as to intention or other state of mind;

fail to correct another’s false impression which the person previously has created or confirmed;

prevent another from acquiring pertinent information;

“knowingly” means for a person to be aware with respect to conduct or to a circumstance described by a provision of law that the person’s conduct is of that nature or that the circumstance exists; when knowledge of the existence of a particular fact is required, that knowledge is established if a person is aware of a substantial probability of its existence, unless the person actually believes it does not exist;

“precinct” means the territory within which resident voters may cast votes at one polling place;

“state employee” means a person employed by the state who is paid a wage or salary, but does not include a person hired by the state to work as an independent contractor or a person who is in the custody of the state.

History.

(§ 18 ch 112 SLA 1982)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

39.25.181

. Renumbered in 1995.

Sec. 39.25.995.
Short title.

This chapter may be cited as the State Personnel Act.

History.

(§ 2 ch 144 SLA 1960)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

39.25.220

. Renumbered in 1995.